Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2912
Application deadline; allocation, issuance, or use of credits deadline.

There shall be no new applications filed under the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Act after December 31, 2030. All applications and all credits pending or approved before such date shall continue in full force and effect, except that no credits shall be allocated under section 77-2905, issued under section 77-2906, or used on any tax return or similar filing after December 31, 2035.

Laws 2014, LB191, § 12;

Laws 2015, LB538, § 11;

Laws 2016, LB1022, § 7;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 83.